Colorado, session 2026A, HB1127.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 42-4-1609 as
follows:
42-4-1609. Coroners to report.
Every coroner or other official performing like functions shall on or
before the tenth day of each month report in writing to the department the
death of any person within such official's jurisdiction during the preceding
calendar month as the result of an accident involving a motor vehicle and
the circumstances of such accident UPON REQUEST BY THE DEPARTMENT OF
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

TRANSPORTATION, EVERY CORONER OR OTHER OFFICIAL PERFORMING LIKE
FUNCTIONS SHALL ELECTRONICALLY REPORT ALL AVAILABLE TOXICOLOGY
RESULTS TO THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION BY THE FINAL BUSINESS
DAY OF EACH QUARTER OF THE CALENDAR YEAR FOR EACH DECEASED PARTY
WHO DIED DURING THE QUARTER AS THE RESULT OF A CRASH INVOLVING A
MOTOR VEHICLE WITHIN THE OFFICIAL'S JURISDICTION. IF A CORONER DOES
NOT HAVE ACCESS TO NECESSARY TOXICOLOGY RESULTS ON THE FINAL
BUSINESS DAY OF THE QUARTER, THE REPORT MUST BE SUBMITTED IN THE
NEXT QUARTER OF THE CALENDAR YEAR WHEN COMPLETE RESULTS ARE
AVAILABLE. THE REPORT MUST INCLUDE ALL AVAILABLE TOXICOLOGY
RESULTS FOR ALL DECEASED PARTIES INVOLVED IN A CRASH, INCLUDING, BUT
NOT LIMITED TO, THE BLOOD ALCOHOL CONCENTRATIONS; DRUG SCREENING
PANELS; AND THE DATE, TIME, AND SOURCE OF THE SAMPLE COLLECTIONS.
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION MAY ONLY REQUEST PERSONAL
IDENTIFYING INFORMATION ABOUT A DECEASED PERSON PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION THAT IS NECESSARY TO MEET FEDERAL REPORTING REQUIREMENTS.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-4-1606, amend
(4)(a)(I) as follows:
42-4-1606. Duty to report accidents.
(4) (a) (I) It is the duty of all law enforcement officers who receive
notification of traffic accidents CRASHES within their respective
jurisdictions or who investigate such accidents TRAFFIC CRASHES either at
the time of or at the scene of the accident CRASH or thereafter by
interviewing participants or witnesses to submit reports of all such accidents
CRASHES to the department on the form provided, including insurance
information received from any driver, within five days of AFTER the time
they receive such THE information or complete their investigation. IF A
PARTICIPANT IN A CRASH DIES WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER THE CRASH AS A
RESULT OF AN INJURY SUSTAINED IN THE CRASH, THE LAW ENFORCEMENT
OFFICER WHO WAS NOTIFIED OF OR INVESTIGATED THE CRASH SHALL SUBMIT
AN AMENDED REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT WITHIN FIVE DAYS AFTER
RECEIVING NOTIFICATION OF THE DEATH. The law enforcement officer shall
indicate in such THE report whether the inflatable restraint system in the
vehicle, if any, inflated and deployed in the accident CRASH. For the
purposes of this section, "inflatable restraint system" has the same meaning
as set forth in 49 CFR sec. 507.208 S4.1.5.1 (b) 49 CFR SEC. 571.208
S4.1.5.1 (b).
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1127

SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1127

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1127